New York, session 2025-2026, S7432.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new article 2 9-e to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 9-E 4 RESTRICTIONS ON CERTAIN ACTIVITIES BY HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATIONS 5 Section 344-a. Restrictions on the usage of pesticides. 6 344-b. Restrictions on use of outdoor sprinkler systems. 7 § 344-a. Restrictions on the usage of pesticides. A homeowners associ- 8 ation may not require an owner to apply a pesticide, as such term is 9 defined in section 33-0101 of the environmental conservation law, and 10 shall allow any owner to exclude the owner's property from the landscap- 11 ing activities of the association that include application of a pesti- 12 cide, except to the extent a pesticide or other pest management practice 13 is necessary to manage or prevent a pest issue that could harm ecologi- 14 cal or public health. 15 § 344-b. Restrictions on use of outdoor sprinkler systems. A homeown- 16 ers association may not require an owner to use any outdoor sprinkler 17 system. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11680-01-5